Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.1921

Warehouse facilities—Central salvage—Sales, exchanges, between state agencies.

The director shall:

(1) Establish and maintain warehouses for the centralized storage and distribution of such supplies, equipment, and other items of common use in order to effect economies in the purchase of supplies and equipment for state agencies. To provide warehouse facilities the department may, by arrangement with the state agencies, utilize any surplus available state-owned space, and may acquire other needed warehouse facilities by lease or purchase of the necessary premises;

(2) Provide for the central salvage of equipment, furniture, or furnishings used by state agencies, and also by means of such a service provide an equipment pool for effecting sales and exchanges of surplus and unused property by and between state agencies.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 219; 1979 c 151 s 100; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1921. Prior: 1959 c 178 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.